District of Columbia statutes.
7-1305.08

Sterilization.

No individual served at a facility shall be sterilized by any employee of a facility or by any other person acting at the direction of, or under the authorization of, the Director or any other employee of a facility.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 508, 25 DCR 5094
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 506(s), 42 DCR 3684
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 17(mm), 59 DCR 5567
1981 Ed., § 6-1968.
1973 Ed., § 6-1688.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “individual served at” for “customer of.”

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 505(s) of Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Temporary Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 10-253, March 23, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 1652).

For temporary amendment of section, see § 505(s) of the Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Emergency Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-389, December 29, 1994, 42 DCR 197).
Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.